Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202549-1808
Attorney; unsworn declaration; penalty of perjury; forms.

Wherever any matter is required or permitted to be supported, evidenced, established, or proved by the sworn declaration, verification, certificate, statement, oath, or affidavit, in writing, of an attorney, whose signature is required by virtue of the attorney's representation of a party in an action, making the same (other than a deposition, an oath of office, or an oath required to be taken before a specified official other than a notary public), such matter may, with like force and effect, be supported, evidenced, established, or proved by the unsworn declaration, certificate, verification, or statement, in writing, of such attorney which is subscribed by the attorney, as true under penalty of perjury, and dated, in substantially the following form:

(1) If executed outside of the State of Nebraska: I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of Nebraska that the foregoing is true and correct. Executed on (date). (Signature); or

(2) If executed within the State of Nebraska: I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and correct. Executed on (date). (Signature).

Laws 2025, LB470, § 1.